Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.420

Transfer of system from county to water-sewer district—Annexation—Hearing—Public notice—Operation of system.

If so provided in the transfer agreement, the area served by the system shall, upon completion of the transfer, be deemed annexed to and become a part of the water-sewer district acquiring the system. The county shall provide notice of the hearing by the county legislative authority on the ordinance executing the transfer agreement under RCW 36.94.330 as follows: (1) By mailed notice to all ratepayers served by the system at least fifteen days prior to the hearing; and (2) by notice in a newspaper of general circulation once at least fifteen days prior to the hearing.

In the event of an annexation under this section resulting from the transfer of a system of sewerage, a system of water, or combined water and sewer systems from a county to a water-sewer district, the water-sewer district shall operate the system or systems under the provisions of Title 57 RCW.

[ 1999 c 153 s 52; 1996 c 230 s 1609; 1985 c 141 s 1; 1984 c 147 s 2.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1996 c 230: See notes following RCW 57.02.001.